tests/numerals/percents.yaml
  "numbers in acc":
    1<num><percent><subst><acc> : "1%-ны"
    2<num><percent><subst><acc> : "2%-ны"
    3<num><percent><subst><acc> : "3%-ны"
    4<num><percent><subst><acc> : "4%-ны"
    5<num><percent><subst><acc> : "5%-ны"
    6<num><percent><subst><acc> : "6%-ны"
    7<num><percent><subst><acc> : "7%-ны"
    8<num><percent><subst><acc> : "8%-ны"
    9<num><percent><subst><acc> : "9%-ны"
    10<num><percent><subst><acc> : "10%-ны"
    11<num><percent><subst><acc> : "11%-ны"
    12<num><percent><subst><acc> : "12%-ны"
    13<num><percent><subst><acc> : "13%-ны"
    14<num><percent><subst><acc> : "14%-ны"
    15<num><percent><subst><acc> : "15%-ны"
    16<num><percent><subst><acc> : "16%-ны"
    17<num><percent><subst><acc> : "17%-ны"
    18<num><percent><subst><acc> : "18%-ны"
    19<num><percent><subst><acc> : "19%-ны"
    20<num><percent><subst><acc> : "20%-ны"
    21<num><percent><subst><acc> : "21%-ны"
    22<num><percent><subst><acc> : "22%-ны"
    23<num><percent><subst><acc> : "23%-ны"
    24<num><percent><subst><acc> : "24%-ны"
    25<num><percent><subst><acc> : "25%-ны"
    26<num><percent><subst><acc> : "26%-ны"
    27<num><percent><subst><acc> : "27%-ны"
    28<num><percent><subst><acc> : "28%-ны"
    29<num><percent><subst><acc> : "29%-ны"
    30<num><percent><subst><acc> : "30%-ны"
    31<num><percent><subst><acc> : "31%-ны"
    32<num><percent><subst><acc> : "32%-ны"
    33<num><percent><subst><acc> : "33%-ны"
    34<num><percent><subst><acc> : "34%-ны"
    35<num><percent><subst><acc> : "35%-ны"
    36<num><percent><subst><acc> : "36%-ны"
    37<num><percent><subst><acc> : "37%-ны"
    38<num><percent><subst><acc> : "38%-ны"
    39<num><percent><subst><acc> : "39%-ны"
    40<num><percent><subst><acc> : "40%-ны"
    41<num><percent><subst><acc> : "41%-ны"
    42<num><percent><subst><acc> : "42%-ны"
    43<num><percent><subst><acc> : "43%-ны"
    44<num><percent><subst><acc> : "44%-ны"
    45<num><percent><subst><acc> : "45%-ны"
    46<num><percent><subst><acc> : "46%-ны"
    47<num><percent><subst><acc> : "47%-ны"
    48<num><percent><subst><acc> : "48%-ны"
    49<num><percent><subst><acc> : "49%-ны"
    50<num><percent><subst><acc> : "50%-ны"
    51<num><percent><subst><acc> : "51%-ны"
    52<num><percent><subst><acc> : "52%-ны"
    53<num><percent><subst><acc> : "53%-ны"
    54<num><percent><subst><acc> : "54%-ны"
    55<num><percent><subst><acc> : "55%-ны"
    56<num><percent><subst><acc> : "56%-ны"
    57<num><percent><subst><acc> : "57%-ны"
    58<num><percent><subst><acc> : "58%-ны"
    59<num><percent><subst><acc> : "59%-ны"
    60<num><percent><subst><acc> : "60%-ны"
    61<num><percent><subst><acc> : "61%-ны"
    62<num><percent><subst><acc> : "62%-ны"
    63<num><percent><subst><acc> : "63%-ны"
    64<num><percent><subst><acc> : "64%-ны"
    65<num><percent><subst><acc> : "65%-ны"
    66<num><percent><subst><acc> : "66%-ны"
    67<num><percent><subst><acc> : "67%-ны"
    68<num><percent><subst><acc> : "68%-ны"
    69<num><percent><subst><acc> : "69%-ны"
    70<num><percent><subst><acc> : "70%-ны"
    71<num><percent><subst><acc> : "71%-ны"
    72<num><percent><subst><acc> : "72%-ны"
    73<num><percent><subst><acc> : "73%-ны"
    74<num><percent><subst><acc> : "74%-ны"
    75<num><percent><subst><acc> : "75%-ны"
    76<num><percent><subst><acc> : "76%-ны"
    77<num><percent><subst><acc> : "77%-ны"
    78<num><percent><subst><acc> : "78%-ны"
    79<num><percent><subst><acc> : "79%-ны"
    80<num><percent><subst><acc> : "80%-ны"
    81<num><percent><subst><acc> : "81%-ны"
    82<num><percent><subst><acc> : "82%-ны"
    83<num><percent><subst><acc> : "83%-ны"
    84<num><percent><subst><acc> : "84%-ны"
    85<num><percent><subst><acc> : "85%-ны"
    86<num><percent><subst><acc> : "86%-ны"
    87<num><percent><subst><acc> : "87%-ны"
    88<num><percent><subst><acc> : "88%-ны"
    89<num><percent><subst><acc> : "89%-ны"
    90<num><percent><subst><acc> : "90%-ны"
    91<num><percent><subst><acc> : "91%-ны"
    92<num><percent><subst><acc> : "92%-ны"
    93<num><percent><subst><acc> : "93%-ны"
    94<num><percent><subst><acc> : "94%-ны"
    95<num><percent><subst><acc> : "95%-ны"
    96<num><percent><subst><acc> : "96%-ны"
    97<num><percent><subst><acc> : "97%-ны"
    98<num><percent><subst><acc> : "98%-ны"
    99<num><percent><subst><acc> : "99%-ны"
    100<num><percent><subst><acc> : "100%-ны"
    1<num><percent><subst><acc> : "1%-не"
    2<num><percent><subst><acc> : "2%-не"
    3<num><percent><subst><acc> : "3%-не"
    4<num><percent><subst><acc> : "4%-не"
    5<num><percent><subst><acc> : "5%-не"
    6<num><percent><subst><acc> : "6%-не"
    7<num><percent><subst><acc> : "7%-не"
    8<num><percent><subst><acc> : "8%-не"
    9<num><percent><subst><acc> : "9%-не"
    10<num><percent><subst><acc> : "10%-не"
    11<num><percent><subst><acc> : "11%-не"
    12<num><percent><subst><acc> : "12%-не"
    13<num><percent><subst><acc> : "13%-не"
    14<num><percent><subst><acc> : "14%-не"
    15<num><percent><subst><acc> : "15%-не"
    16<num><percent><subst><acc> : "16%-не"
    17<num><percent><subst><acc> : "17%-не"
    18<num><percent><subst><acc> : "18%-не"
    19<num><percent><subst><acc> : "19%-не"
    20<num><percent><subst><acc> : "20%-не"
    21<num><percent><subst><acc> : "21%-не"
    22<num><percent><subst><acc> : "22%-не"
    23<num><percent><subst><acc> : "23%-не"
    24<num><percent><subst><acc> : "24%-не"
    25<num><percent><subst><acc> : "25%-не"
    26<num><percent><subst><acc> : "26%-не"
    27<num><percent><subst><acc> : "27%-не"
    28<num><percent><subst><acc> : "28%-не"
    29<num><percent><subst><acc> : "29%-не"
    30<num><percent><subst><acc> : "30%-не"
    31<num><percent><subst><acc> : "31%-не"
    32<num><percent><subst><acc> : "32%-не"
    33<num><percent><subst><acc> : "33%-не"
    34<num><percent><subst><acc> : "34%-не"
    35<num><percent><subst><acc> : "35%-не"
    36<num><percent><subst><acc> : "36%-не"
    37<num><percent><subst><acc> : "37%-не"
    38<num><percent><subst><acc> : "38%-не"
    39<num><percent><subst><acc> : "39%-не"
    40<num><percent><subst><acc> : "40%-не"
    41<num><percent><subst><acc> : "41%-не"
    42<num><percent><subst><acc> : "42%-не"
    43<num><percent><subst><acc> : "43%-не"
    44<num><percent><subst><acc> : "44%-не"
    45<num><percent><subst><acc> : "45%-не"
    46<num><percent><subst><acc> : "46%-не"
    47<num><percent><subst><acc> : "47%-не"
    48<num><percent><subst><acc> : "48%-не"
    49<num><percent><subst><acc> : "49%-не"
    50<num><percent><subst><acc> : "50%-не"
    51<num><percent><subst><acc> : "51%-не"
    52<num><percent><subst><acc> : "52%-не"
    53<num><percent><subst><acc> : "53%-не"
    54<num><percent><subst><acc> : "54%-не"
    55<num><percent><subst><acc> : "55%-не"
    56<num><percent><subst><acc> : "56%-не"
    57<num><percent><subst><acc> : "57%-не"
    58<num><percent><subst><acc> : "58%-не"
    59<num><percent><subst><acc> : "59%-не"
    60<num><percent><subst><acc> : "60%-не"
    61<num><percent><subst><acc> : "61%-не"
    62<num><percent><subst><acc> : "62%-не"
    63<num><percent><subst><acc> : "63%-не"
    64<num><percent><subst><acc> : "64%-не"
    65<num><percent><subst><acc> : "65%-не"
    66<num><percent><subst><acc> : "66%-не"
    67<num><percent><subst><acc> : "67%-не"
    68<num><percent><subst><acc> : "68%-не"
    69<num><percent><subst><acc> : "69%-не"
    70<num><percent><subst><acc> : "70%-не"
    71<num><percent><subst><acc> : "71%-не"
    72<num><percent><subst><acc> : "72%-не"
    73<num><percent><subst><acc> : "73%-не"
    74<num><percent><subst><acc> : "74%-не"
    75<num><percent><subst><acc> : "75%-не"
    76<num><percent><subst><acc> : "76%-не"
    77<num><percent><subst><acc> : "77%-не"
    78<num><percent><subst><acc> : "78%-не"
    79<num><percent><subst><acc> : "79%-не"
    80<num><percent><subst><acc> : "80%-не"
    81<num><percent><subst><acc> : "81%-не"
    82<num><percent><subst><acc> : "82%-не"
    83<num><percent><subst><acc> : "83%-не"
    84<num><percent><subst><acc> : "84%-не"
    85<num><percent><subst><acc> : "85%-не"
    86<num><percent><subst><acc> : "86%-не"
    87<num><percent><subst><acc> : "87%-не"
    88<num><percent><subst><acc> : "88%-не"
    89<num><percent><subst><acc> : "89%-не"
    90<num><percent><subst><acc> : "90%-не"
    91<num><percent><subst><acc> : "91%-не"
    92<num><percent><subst><acc> : "92%-не"
    93<num><percent><subst><acc> : "93%-не"
    94<num><percent><subst><acc> : "94%-не"
    95<num><percent><subst><acc> : "95%-не"
    96<num><percent><subst><acc> : "96%-не"
    97<num><percent><subst><acc> : "97%-не"
    98<num><percent><subst><acc> : "98%-не"
    99<num><percent><subst><acc> : "99%-не"
    100<num><percent><subst><acc> : "100%-не"
